Utah statutes.
16-15-110.   Trustee and beneficiary governed by declaration of trust -- Common law.

(1)  A trustee or beneficiary of a business trust shall be governed by all the provisions of the declaration of trust of the business trust.

(2)  This chapter neither affects nor alters in any way the rights, powers, and obligations, of a trustee or beneficiary of a business trust under common law.

